Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF154.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 1864YH (4) 91 je/jh H.F. 154 Section 1. Section 262.9, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 39. Direct the institutions of higher 3 learning governed by the board to waive undergraduate tuition 4 and mandatory fees for a resident of Iowa who receives the 5 maximum score possible on the college readiness assessment 6 administered by ACT, inc., or the college readiness assessment 7 administered by the college board and to provide the student 8 with a stipend of five thousand dollars per semester. The 9 board may require that documentation of the score be provided 10 in order to qualify for such a waiver and stipend. A student 11 must make satisfactory academic progress toward graduation in 12 order to continue to receive such a waiver and stipend. The 13 board may establish standards for such progress. 14